src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-I-I-inaatsi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - inaatsi - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, appear AEW NA1
     PN/niit+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: niitsinááttsiwa
     PV/iik+PN/oomok+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikóómoksinááttsiwa
     PV/iik+PN/ohpo+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: ííkohpoinaattsiwa
     Past+PV/hkana+PN/omia'nist+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Pl: iihkanáómia'nistsinaattsiyi
     Fut+PV/isttsikohpo+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: áaksisttsikohpoinááttsiwa
     Fut+PN/ipiiw+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: áaksipiiyinááttsiwa
     PV/iik+PV/aanist+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: ííkaanistsinaattsiwa
     PN/sikotahko+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: sikótahkoinaattsiwa
     Past+PN/sstsaap+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iisstsáápinaattsiwa
     Past+PN/ohsi+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: issíinááttsiwa
     PN/ipiiw+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: ipííyinaattsiwa
     Dur+PN/apoyi+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aapoyíínaattsiwa
     Fut+PV/anist+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: áakanistsinaattsiwa
     Fut+PN/apoyi+inááttsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: áakapoyíínaattsiwa
